th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > การให้นม: อาหารทารกและเด็กเล็ก; เครื่องจับเวลาสำหรับการดูแลเด็กทารก; เครื่องอุ่นและฆ่าเชื้อขวดนม; ที่จัดเก็บน้ำนมแม่; อุปกรณ์ที่ปั๊มนม; ที่ปั๊มน้ำนม; ผ้าสำหรับเรอ; อุปกรณ์สำคัญในการป้อนอาหารเด็ก; ผ้าคลุมให้นม; ผ้ารองและที่กั้นสำหรับให้นม; ปลอกหมอนรองให้นมลูก; หมอนให้นม
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Imetys ja syöttäminen: Vauvan ja leikki-ikäisen ruoka; Vauvanhoitoajastin; Pullonlämmittimet ja sterilointilaitteet; Rintamaidon säilytysastiat; Rintapumpun lisätarvikkeet; Rintapumput; Pulauttelupyyhkeet; Syöttämisen perustarvikkeet; Imetysliina; Liivinsuojat ja rintakumit; Imetystyynyn päälliset; Imetystyynyt
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Amamentação e alimentação: Comida para bebé e criança; Temporizadores para bebés; Esterilizadores e aquecedores de biberão; Recipientes para armazenamento de leite materno; Acessórios de bomba de aleitamento; Bombas de aleitamento; Panos para refluxo; Essencial para alimentação; Coberturas para amamentação; Almofadas e proteções para alimentação; Coberturas de almofadas de amamentação; Almofadas de amamentação
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Lactancia y alimentación: Comida para bebés y niños; Temporizadores para los cuidados del bebé; Esterilizadores y calentadores de biberones; Contenedores de leche materna; Accesorios para sacaleches; Sacaleches; Baberos para eructos; Artículos esenciales de alimentación; Delantales de lactancia; Protectores y almohadillas de lactancia; Fundas para almohadillas de lactancia; Almohadas de lactancia
da: Baby og småbørn > Amning og madning: Baby og småbørn – mad; Babypleje – ur; Flaskevarmere og -sterilisering; Beholdere til modermælk; Tilbehør til brystpumper; Brystpumper; Hagesmække; Nødvendigheder til bespisning; Ammetæpper; Brystpuder og ammebrikker; Betræk til ammepuder; Ammepuder
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Karmienie: Jedzenie dla dzieci i niemowląt; Zegary do pielęgnacji niemowląt; Podgrzewacze butelek i sterylizatory; Pojemniki na pokarm matki; Akcesoria do laktatorów; Laktatory; Ściereczki do odbijania; Podstawowe artykuły do karmienia niemowląt; Przykrycia do karmienia; Wkładki laktacyjne i osłonki na brodawki; Poszewki na poduszki do karmienia; Poduszki do karmienia
sk-SK: Bábätká > Dojčenie a kŕmenie: Dojčenské príkrmy; Dojčenské časovače; Ohrievače a sterilizátory fliaš; Nádoby na skladovanie materského mlieka; Príslušenstvo k odsávačkám mlieka; Odsávačky materského mlieka; Utierky na odgrgnutie; Základné potreby na kŕmenie; Prikrývky na dojčenie; Podložky na dojčenie a chrániče bradaviek; Obliečky na vankúše na dojčenie; Vankúše na dojčenie
ru: Товары для детей > Питание и кормление: Продукты питания для детей и младенцев; Таймеры для ухода за детьми; Подогреватели и стерилизаторы для бутылочек; Емкости для хранения грудного молока; Аксессуары для молокоотсосов; Молокоотсосы; Салфетки для срыгивания; Посуда для кормления; Накидки для кормления грудью; Накладки на соски и лактационные вкладыши; Чехлы на подушки для кормления; Подушки для кормления
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Szoptatás és etetés: Baba- és csecsemőétel; Babaápolási időzítők; Üvegmelegítők és -sterilizálók; Anyatejtároló tartályok; Mellszívó-kiegészítők; Mellszívók; Büfikendők; Etetőkellékek; Szoptatóhuzatok; Szoptatóbetétek és -pajzsok; Szoptatóspárna-huzatok; Szoptatós párnák
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Emzirme ve Beslenme: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Gıdaları; Bebek Bakım Zamanlayıcıları; Biberon Isıtıcı ve Sterilizatörler; Anne Sütü Depolama Kapları; Göğüs Pompası Aksesuarları; Göğüs Pompaları; Gaz Çıkarma ve Omuz Bezleri; Beslenme Gereçleri; Emzirme Önlükleri; Göğüs Pedleri ve Koruyucuları; Emzirme Yastığı Kılıfları; Emzirme Yastıkları
nb: Baby og barn > Amming og mating: Mat for baby og barn; Tidtakere for babypleie; Flaskevarmere og -sterilisatorer; Lagringsbeholdere for morsmelk; Tilbehør for brystpumper; Brystpumper; Rapekluter; Nødvendigheter for fôring; Ammetrekk; Ammeinnlegg og skjold; Trekk til ammeputer; Ammeputer
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 哺育和餵食: 嬰幼兒食品; 嬰兒照護計時器; 奶瓶溫奶器和消毒鍋; 母乳保存瓶; 擠乳器配件; 擠乳器; 拍嗝巾; 餵食必需品; 哺乳巾; 防溢乳墊/乳頭保護罩; 哺乳枕套; 哺乳枕
en: Baby & Toddler > Nursing & Feeding: Baby & Toddler Food; Baby Care Timers; Bottle Warmers & Sterilizers; Breast Milk Storage Containers; Breast Pump Accessories; Breast Pumps; Burp Cloths; Feeding Essentials; Nursing Covers; Nursing Pads & Shields; Nursing Pillow Covers; Nursing Pillows
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Dojenje i hranjenje: Hrana za bebe i malu djecu; Mjerači vremena za njegu bebe; Grijači i sterilizatori bočica; Spremnici za pohranu majčinog mlijeka; Pribor za izdajalice; Pumpice za izdajanje mlijeka; Krpe za podrigivanje; Pribor za hranjenje; Pokrivači za dojenje; Jastučići i štitnici za dojilje; Navlake za jastuke za dojenje; Jastuci za dojenje
ko: 영유아 > 수유/이유식 용품: 영유아식; 육아용 타이머; 젖병 워머/살균기; 모유 저장팩; 유축기 부대용품; 유축기; 트림 수건; 유아식 필수품; 수유 가리개; 수유 패드/유두 보호기; 수유 베개 커버; 수유 쿠션
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Кърмене и хранене: Храна за бебета и малки деца; Таймери за грижа за бебето; Нагреватели и стерилизатори за шишета; Контейнери за съхранение на кърма; Аксесоари за помпа за кърма; Помпи за кърма; Кърпи за оригване; Прибори за хранене на бебета; Покривала при кърмене; Подплънки и протектори за кърмачки; Калъфки за възглавници за кърмене; Възглавници за кърмене
it: Bebè e bimbi > Allattamento e alimentazione: Alimenti per bebè e bambini; Timer per cura bebè; Scaldabiberon e sterilizzatori; Contenitori per allattamento; Accessori per tiralatte; Tiralatte; Panni antirigurgito; Alimenti essenziali; Foulard e teli copri-allattamento; Protezioni per capezzoli e cuscinetti per allattamento; Coperture per cuscini da allattamento; Cuscini per allattamento
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 哺乳与喂养: 婴幼儿食品; 婴儿护理定时器; 奶瓶保温器与消毒器; 母乳储存容器; 吸奶器配件; 吸奶器; 口水巾/打嗝垫布; 喂养必需品; 哺乳巾; 防溢乳垫/罩; 哺乳枕套; 哺乳枕
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Allaitement et alimentation: Nourriture pour bébés et tout-petits; Minuteurs pour le soin du bébé; Chauffe-biberons et stérilisateurs; Récipients de conservation de lait maternel; Accessoires pour tire-laits; Tire-lait; Protège-épaules; Essentiels pour l’alimentation; Capes d’allaitement; Coussinets d’allaitement et téterelles; Housses pour coussins d’allaitement; Coussins d’allaitement
sv: Baby och småbarn > Amning och matning: Mat för baby och småbarn; Babytimers; Flaskvärmare och steriliserare; Förvaringsbehållare för bröstmjölk; Bröstpumpstillbehör; Bröstpumpar; Kräklappar; Nutrition; Amningsfiltar; Amningskupor och bröstvårtsskydd; Kuddfodral till amningskuddar; Amningskuddar
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Θηλασμός & σίτιση: Βρεφική & παιδική τροφή; Χρονόμετρα βρεφικής φροντίδας; Θερμαντήρες & αποστειρωτές μπιμπερό; Δοχεία αποθήκευσης μητρικού γάλακτος; Αξεσουάρ για θήλαστρα; Θήλαστρα; Πανάκια για ρέψιμο; Απαραίτητα σκεύη σίτισης; Καλύμματα θηλασμού; Επιθέματα θηλασμού & προστατευτικά θηλών; Καλύμματα μαξιλαριού θηλασμού; Μαξιλάρια θηλασμού
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Alăptare și hrănire: Alimente pentru bebeluși și copii mici; Cronometre pentru îngrijirea bebelușilor; Încălzitoare și sterilizatoare de biberoane; Recipiente pentru depozitarea laptelui matern; Accesorii pentru pompă pentru sâni; Pompe pentru sân; Museline pentru bebeluși; Articole esențiale pentru hrănire; Pânză pentru alăptare; Tampoane și protecții pentru alăptare; Huse perne pentru alăptare; Perne pentru alăptare
cs: Děti a kojenci > Kojení a krmení: Dětská a kojenecká strava; Zařízení pro časování péče o kojence; Ohřívače a sterilizátory lahví; Nádoby na uskladnění mateřského mléka; Příslušenství k odsávačkám mateřského mléka; Odsávačky na mléko; Hadříky na odříhnutí; Základní potřeby ke krmení; Kojící peleríny; Chrániče a vložky do podprsenky; Povlaky na kojicí polštáře; Kojicí polštáře
pt-BR: Infantil > Amamentação e alimentação: Comida para bebês; Relógios para cuidados do bebê; Aquecedores e esterilizadores de mamadeiras; Recipiente para armazenar leite materno; Acessórios para bomba extratora de leite materno; Bombas tira-leite; Panos de ombro; Itens essenciais para alimentação; Capas de amamentação; Almofadas e protetores para mamilos; Capas para almofadas de amamentação; Almofadas para amamentação
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Žindymas ir maitinimas: Maistas kūdikiams ir mažiems vaikams; Kūdikių priežiūros laikmačiai; Buteliukų šildytuvai ir sterilizatoriai; Motinos pieno laikymo indai; Pientraukių priedai; Pientraukiai; Atsirūgimo šluostės; Būtiniausi maitinimo reikmenys; Žindymo skraistės; Žindymo įdėklai ir skydeliai; Žindymo pagalvių užvalkalai; Žindymo pagalvės
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Dojenje in hranjenje: Hrana za dojenčke in malčke; Časovniki za nego dojenčka; Grelniki in sterilizatorji stekleničk; Posode za shranjevanje materinega mleka; Dodatki za prsne črpalke; Prsne črpalke; Krpice za podiranje kupčka; Osnovni pripomočki za hranjenje; Prevleke za dojenje; Blazinice in ščitniki za dojenje; Prevleke za blazine za dojenje; Blazine za dojenje
nl: Baby en peuter > Borstvoeding en voeding: Voeding voor baby's en peuters; Timers voor babyverzorging; Flessenwarmers en -sterilisators; Moedermelkopslag; Kolfaccessoires; Kolfapparaten; Spuugdoekjes; Voedingsbenodigdheden; Voedingsdoeken; Zoogkompressen en tepelhoedjes; Hoezen voor voedingskussens; Voedingskussens
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Cho con bú và cho ăn: Đồ ăn cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ; Thiết bị hẹn giờ hỗ trợ chăm sóc trẻ; Máy hâm sữa và tiệt trùng bình sữa; Bình đựng sữa mẹ; Phụ kiện hút nữa; Máy hút sữa; Khăn trớ; Dụng cụ ăn dặm; Khăn che cho con bú; Miếng chặn sữa; Vỏ gối điều dưỡng; Gối cho con bú
ja: ベビー用品 > 授乳・離乳食: ベビーフード・離乳食; ベビーケアタイマー; 哺乳瓶用保温器・消毒器; 母乳保存容器; 搾乳器関連用品; 搾乳器; 授乳用肩掛け; 離乳食用品; 授乳ケープ; 授乳パッド・乳頭保護器; 授乳クッションカバー; 授乳用枕
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Stillen & Füttern: Nahrung für Babys & Kleinkinder; Babypflege-Timer; Flaschenwärmer & Sterilisatoren; Muttermilchbehälter; Milchpumpenzubehör; Milchpumpen; Baby-Spucktücher; Zubehör für Babynahrung; Stilltücher; Stillhütchen & -einlagen; Stillkissenbezüge; Stillkissen